Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 2
NURSING FACILITIES

25.5-6-201. Special definitions relating to nursing facility reimbursement.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Acquisition cost" means the actual allowable cost to the owners of a capital-related asset or any improvement thereto as determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

"Actual cost" or "cost" means the audited cost of providing services.

"Administration and general services costs" means costs in the following categories:

Advertising, recruitment, and public relations, to the extent that such costs are necessary, reasonable, and patient-related;

Travel and training of facility staff, unless the travel includes residents of the facility or the training is for the facility staff described in paragraph (a) of subsection (15) of this section; and

All other costs that are not direct or indirect health-care services, raw food costs, or capital-related assets.

"Appraised value" means the determination by a qualified appraiser who is a member of an institute of real estate appraisers, or its equivalent, of the depreciated cost of replacement of a capital-related asset to its current owner. The depreciated replacement appraisal must be based on a nationally recognized valuation system determined by the state department. The depreciated cost of replacement appraisal must be redetermined at least every four years by new appraisals of the nursing facilities. The new appraisals must be based upon rules promulgated by the state board.

"Array of facility providers" means a listing in order from lowest per diem cost facility to highest for that category of costs or rates, as may be applicable, of all medicaid-participating nursing facility providers in the state.

"Base value" means:

For the fiscal year 1986-87 and every fourth year thereafter, the appraised value of a capital-related asset;

For each year in which an appraisal is not done pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), the most recent appraisal together with fifty percent of any increase or decrease each year since the last appraisal, as reflected in the index.

For the fiscal year 1985-86, the base value shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars per licensed bed at any participating facility, and, for each succeeding fiscal year, the base value shall not exceed the previous year's limitation adjusted by any increase or decrease in the index.

An improvement to a capital-related asset, which is an addition to that asset, as defined by rules adopted by the state board, shall increase the base value by the acquisition cost of the improvement.

"Capital-related asset" means the land, buildings, and fixed equipment of a participating facility.

"Case-mix" means a relative score or weight assigned for a given group of residents based upon their levels of resources, consumption, and needs.

"Case-mix adjusted direct health-care services costs" means those costs comprising the compensation, salaries, bonuses, workers' compensation, employer-contributed taxes, and other employment benefits attributable to a nursing facility provider's direct care nursing staff whether employed directly or as contract employees, including but not limited to registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, and nurses' aides.

(9.5) "Case-mix group" means the system determined by the state department for grouping a nursing facility's residents according to their clinical and functional status as identified from data supplied by the facility's minimum data set as published by the United States department of health and human services.

"Case-mix index" means a numeric score assigned to each nursing facility resident based upon a resident's physical and mental condition that reflects the amount of relative resources required to provide care to that resident.

"Case-mix neutral" means the direct health-care costs of all facilities adjusted to a common case-mix.

"Case-mix reimbursement" means a payment system that reimburses each facility according to the resource consumption in treating its case-mix of medicaid residents, which case-mix may include such factors as the age, health status, resource utilization, and diagnoses of the facility's medicaid residents as further specified in this section.

"Class I facility" means a private for-profit or not-for-profit nursing facility provider or a facility provider operated by the state of Colorado, a county, a city and county, or special district that provides general skilled nursing facility care to residents who require twenty-four-hour nursing care and services due to their ages, infirmity, or health-care conditions, including residents who are behaviorally challenged by virtue of a severe behavioral or mental health disorder.

"Direct health-care services costs" means those costs subject to case-mix adjusted direct health-care services costs.

"Direct or indirect health-care services costs" means the costs incurred for patient support services, including the following:

Salaries, payroll taxes, workers' compensation payments, training, and other employee benefits for registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, aides, medical records librarians, social workers, and activity personnel;

Nonprescription drugs ordered by a physician;

Consultant fees for nursing, medical records, patient activities, social workers, pharmacies, physicians, and therapies;

Purchases, rentals, and costs incurred to operate, maintain, or repair health-care equipment;

Supplies for nurses, medical records personnel, social workers, activity personnel, and therapy personnel;

Medical director fees;

Therapies and other medically related services, including the following:

Utilization review;

Dental care, when required by federal law;

Audiology;

Psychology;

Physical therapy;

Recreational therapy;

Occupational therapy; and

Speech therapy;

Other patient support services determined and defined by the state board pursuant to rule;

Raw food costs that do not include the costs of equipment, staff, or other costs associated with meal preparation;

Malpractice insurance;

Depreciation and interest for major health-care equipment, such as equipment purchased for the sole purpose of providing care to facility residents; and

Photocopying related to health-care purposes such as medical records of patients.

(15.5) "Eligible nursing facility provider" means a nursing facility, as defined in section 25.5-4-103.

"Facility population distribution" means the number of Colorado nursing facility residents who are classified into each case-mix group as of a specific point in time.

"Fair rental allowance" means the product obtained by multiplying the base value of a capital-related asset by the rental rate.

"Improvement" means the addition to a capital-related asset of land, buildings, or fixed equipment.

"Index" means the RSMeans construction systems cost index or an equivalent index that is based upon a survey of prices of common building materials and wage rates for nursing home construction.

"Index maximization" means classifying a resident who could be assigned to more than one category to the category with the highest case-mix index.

(20.5) Repealed.

"Median per diem cost" means the average daily cost of care and services per patient for the nursing facility provider that represents the middle of all of the arrayed facilities participating as providers or as the number of arrayed facilities may dictate, the mean of the two middle providers.

"Minimum data set" means a set of screening, clinical, and functional status elements that are used in the assessment of a nursing facility provider's residents under the federal medicare and medicaid programs.

"Normalization ratio" means the statewide average case-mix index divided by the facility's cost report period case-mix index.

"Normalized" means multiplying the nursing facility provider's per diem case-mix adjusted direct health-care services cost by its case-mix index normalization ratio for the purpose of making the per diem cost comparable among facilities based upon a common case-mix in order to determine the maximum allowable reimbursement limitation.

"Nursing facility provider" means a facility provider that meets the state nursing home licensing standards established pursuant to section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a), C.R.S., and is maintained primarily for the care and treatment of inpatients under the direction of a physician.

"Nursing salary ratios" means the relative difference in hourly wages of registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, and nurses' aides.

"Nursing weights" means numeric scores assigned to each category of the case-mix groups that measure the relative amount of resources required to provide nursing care to a nursing facility provider's residents.

"Occupancy-imputed days" means the use of a predetermined number for patient days rather than actual patients days in computing per diem cost.

"Per diem cost" means the daily cost of care and services per patient for a nursing facility provider.

"Per diem rate" means the daily dollar amount of reimbursement that the state department shall pay a nursing facility provider per patient.

"Provider fee" means a licensing fee, assessment, or other mandatory payment that is related to health-care items or services as specified under 42 CFR 433.55.

"Raw food" means the products and substances, including but not limited to nutritional supplements, that are consumed by residents.

"Rental rate" means the average annualized composite rate for United States treasury bonds issued for periods of ten years and longer plus two percent. The rental rate shall not exceed ten and three-quarters percent nor fall below eight and one-quarter percent.

Repealed.

"Statewide average per diem rate" means the average daily dollar amount of the per patient payments to all medicaid-participating facility providers in the state.

"Supplemental medicaid payment" means a lump sum payment that is made in addition to a provider's per diem rate. A supplemental medicaid payment is calculated on an annual basis using historical data and paid as a fixed monthly amount with no retroactive adjustment.

"Wage enhancement supplemental payment" means a supplemental payment to an eligible nursing facility provider that is subject to available appropriations and not a rate enhancement.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1924, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1773, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(36) added, (SB 09-263), ch. 203, p. 914, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 2017:

(13) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1329, § 207, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(15.5) and (20.5) added, (HB 19-1210), ch. 320, p. 2976, § 6, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(4), (16), and (27) amended, (9.5) added, and (34) repealed, (HB 21-1227), ch. 192, p. 1015, § 2, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(15.5) amended, (20.5) repealed, and (37) added, (HB 22-1333), ch. 140, p. 930, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-502 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act repealing and reenacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 383, Session Laws of Colorado 2008. For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1210, see section 1 of chapter 320, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-6-202. Providers - nursing facility provider reimbursement - exemption - rules.

Subject to available appropriations, for the purpose of reimbursing a medicaid-certified class I nursing facility provider a per diem rate for the cost of direct and indirect health-care services and raw food, the state department shall establish an annually readjusted schedule to pay each nursing facility provider the actual amount of the costs. The payment shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the median cost of direct and indirect health-care services and raw food as determined by an array of all facility providers; except that, for state veteran nursing homes, the payment shall not exceed one hundred thirty percent of the median cost.
(1) (a) (I) Subject to available appropriations, for the purpose of reimbursing a medicaid-certified class I nursing facility provider a per diem rate for the cost of direct and indirect health-care services and raw food, the state department shall establish an annually readjusted schedule to pay each nursing facility provider the actual amount of the costs. The payment shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the median cost of direct and indirect health-care services and raw food as determined by an array of all facility providers; except that, for state veteran nursing homes, the payment shall not exceed one hundred thirty percent of the median cost.

For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2009, and for each fiscal year thereafter, any increase in the direct and indirect health-care services and raw food costs shall not exceed eight percent per year. The calculation of the eight percent per year limitation for rates effective on July 1, 2009, shall be based on the direct and indirect health-care services and raw food costs in the as-filed facility's cost reports up to and including June 30, 2009. For the purposes of calculating the eight-percent limitation for rates effective after July 1, 2009, the limitation shall be determined and indexed from the direct and indirect health-care services and raw food costs as reported and audited for the rates effective July 1, 2009.

In computing per diem cost, each nursing facility provider shall annually submit cost reports, and actual days of care shall be counted, not occupancy-imputed days of care. In addition, in determining the median cost, the cost of direct health care shall be case-mix neutral. The cost reports used by the state department to establish the per diem cost shall be those filed with the state department during the period ending December 31 of the prior year following implementation of this subsection (1) and for each succeeding year. The state department shall redetermine the median per diem cost based upon the most recent cost reports filed during the period ending December 31 of the prior year.

The state department shall further adjust and, subject to available appropriations, pay the per diem rate to the nursing facility provider for the cost of direct health-care services based upon the acuity or case-mix of the nursing facility provider residents in order to provide for the resource utilization of its residents. The state department shall determine this adjustment in accordance with each resident's status as identified and reported by the nursing facility provider on its federal medicare and medicaid minimum data set assessment. The state department shall establish a case-mix index for each nursing facility provider according to the case-mix group determined by the state department. The state department shall calculate nursing weights based upon standard nursing time studies and weighted by facility population distribution and Colorado-specific nursing salary ratios. The state department shall determine an average case-mix index for each nursing facility provider's medicaid residents on a quarterly basis.

Subject to available appropriations, for the purpose of reimbursing a medicaid-certified class I nursing facility provider a per diem rate for the cost of its administrative and general services, the state department shall establish an annually readjusted schedule to pay each nursing facility provider a reasonable price for the costs, which reasonable price shall be a percentage of the median per diem cost of administrative and general services as determined by an array of all nursing facility providers. For facilities of sixty licensed beds or fewer, the reasonable price shall be one hundred ten percent of the median per diem cost for all class I facilities. For facilities of sixty-one licensed beds and more, the reasonable price shall be one hundred five percent of the median per diem cost for all class I facilities.

In computing per diem cost, each nursing facility provider shall annually submit cost reports to the state department, and actual days of care shall be counted, not occupancy-imputed days of care. The cost reports used to establish this median per diem cost shall be those filed during the period ending December 31 of the prior year following implementation of this subsection (3), and, for each succeeding fourth year, the state department shall redetermine the median per diem cost based upon the most recent cost reports filed during the period ending December 31 of the prior year.

Repealed.

In addition to the reimbursement components paid pursuant to subsections (1) to (3) of this section, a per diem rate constituting a fair rental allowance for capital-related assets shall be paid to each nursing facility provider as a rental rate based upon the nursing facility's appraised value.

Subject to available moneys and the priority of the uses of the provider fees as established in section 25.5-6-203 (2)(b), in addition to the reimbursement rate components paid pursuant to subsections (1) to (4) of this section, the state department shall make a supplemental medicaid payment based upon performance to those nursing facility providers that provide services that result in better care and higher quality of life for their residents. This amount shall be determined by the state department based upon performance measures established in rules adopted by the state board in the domains of quality of life, quality of care, and facility management. The payment shall be computed annually as of July 1, 2009, and each July 1 thereafter, and shall not be less than twenty-five hundredths of one percent of the statewide average per diem rate for the combined rate components determined pursuant to subsections (1) to (4) of this section. During each state fiscal year, the state department may discontinue the supplemental medicaid payment established pursuant to this subsection (5) to any nursing facility provider that fails to comply with the established performance measures during the state fiscal year, and the state department may initiate the supplemental medicaid payment established pursuant to this subsection (5) to any provider who comes into compliance with the established performance measures during the state fiscal year.

Subject to available money and the priority of the uses of the provider fees as established in section 25.5-6-203 (2)(b), in addition to the reimbursement rate components pursuant to subsections (1) to (5) of this section, the state department shall make a supplemental medicaid payment to nursing facility providers that have residents who have moderately to very severe mental health conditions, dementia diseases and related disabilities, or acquired brain injury as follows:

A supplemental medicaid payment shall be made to nursing facility providers that serve residents who have severe mental health conditions that are classified at a level II by the medicaid program's preadmission screening and resident review assessment tool. The state department shall compute this payment annually as of July 1, 2009, and each July 1 thereafter, and it shall be not less than two percent of the statewide average per diem rate for the combined rate components determined pursuant to subsections (1) to (4) of this section.

A supplemental medicaid payment shall be made to nursing facility providers that serve residents with severe dementia diseases and related disabilities or acquired brain injury. The state department shall calculate the payment based upon the resident's cognitive assessment established in rules adopted by the state board. The state department shall compute this payment annually as of July 1, 2009, and each July 1 thereafter, and it shall be not less than one percent of the statewide average per diem rate for the combined rate components determined under subsections (1) to (4) of this section.

Subject to available moneys and the priority of the uses of the provider fees as established in section 25.5-6-203 (2)(b), in addition to the reimbursement rate components paid pursuant to subsections (1) to (6) of this section, the state department shall pay a nursing facility provider a supplemental medicaid payment for care and services rendered to medicaid residents to offset payment of the provider fee assessed under the provisions of section 25.5-6-203. The state department shall compute this payment annually, as of July 1, 2009, and each July 1 thereafter.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-263), ch. 203, p. 912, § 2, effective May 1, 2009.)

The per diem amount paid for direct and indirect health-care services and administrative and general services costs shall include an allowance for inflation in the costs for each category using a nationally recognized service that includes the federal government's forecasts for the prospective medicare reimbursement rates recommended to the United States congress. Amounts contained in cost reports used to determine the per diem amount paid for each category shall be adjusted by the percentage change in this allowance measured from the midpoint of the reporting period of each cost report to the midpoint of the payment-setting period.

Except for changes in the number of patient days, the general fund share of the aggregate statewide average of the per diem rate net of patient payment pursuant to subsections (1) to (4) of this section shall be limited to an annual increase of three percent. The state's share of the reimbursement rate components pursuant to subsections (1) to (4) of this section may be funded through the provider fee assessed pursuant to the provisions of section 25.5-6-203 and any associated federal funds. Any provider fee used as the state's share and all federal funds shall be excluded from the calculation of the general fund limitation on the annual increase. For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2009, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the general fund share of the aggregate statewide average per diem rate net of patient payment pursuant to subsections (1) to (4) of this section shall be calculated using the rates that were effective on July 1 of that fiscal year.

If the aggregate statewide average per diem rate net of patient payment pursuant to subsections (1) to (4) of this section exceeds the general fund share, the amount of the average statewide per diem rate that exceeds the general fund share shall be paid as a supplemental medicaid payment using the provider fee established under section 25.5-6-203. Subject to the priority of the uses of the provider fee established under section 25.5-6-203 (2)(b), if the provider fee is insufficient to fully fund the supplemental medicaid payment, the supplemental medicaid payment shall be reduced to all providers proportionately.

to (V) Repealed.

(VI) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2013, and each fiscal year thereafter, the general fund portion of the per diem rate pursuant to subsections (1) to (4) of this section shall be reduced by one and one-half percent. The state department may, but is not required to, increase the supplemental medicaid payment pursuant to subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b) due to this reduction; except that the provider fee shall not exceed the amount specified in section 25.5-6-203 (1)(a)(II).

(VII) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, for the 2020-21 and 2021-22 fiscal years, the general fund portion of the per diem rate pursuant to subsections (1) to (4) of this section is limited to an annual increase of two percent.

For the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2009, and for each fiscal year thereafter, if the provider fee established under section 25.5-6-203 is insufficient to fully fund the supplemental medicaid payments established under subsections (5) to (7) of this section, subject to the priority of the uses of the provider fee established pursuant to section 25.5-6-203 (2)(b), the state department may suspend or reduce the supplemental medicaid payment subject to the uses of the provider fee established under section 25.5-6-203.

If it is determined by the state department that the case-mix reimbursement includes a factor for nursing facility providers that serve residents with severe dementia diseases and related disabilities or acquired brain injury, the state department may eliminate the supplemental medicaid payment to those providers that serve residents with severe dementia diseases and related disabilities or acquired brain injury.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any federal law that temporarily increases the federal matching participation rate for any fiscal year, payments to nursing facility providers from the general fund share of the aggregate statewide average of the per diem rate shall be calculated based on a fifty-percent federal match.

Repealed.

The general assembly finds that the historical growth in nursing facility provider rates has significantly exceeded the rate of inflation. These increases have been caused in part by the inclusion of medicare costs in medicaid cost reports. The state of Colorado has an interest in limiting these exceptional increases in medicaid nursing facility provider rates by removing medicare part B direct costs from the medicaid nursing facility provider rates and by imposing a ceiling on the medicare part A ancillary costs that are included in calculating medicaid nursing facility rates.

For all rates effective on or after July 1, 1997, for each class I nursing facility provider, only such costs as are reasonable, necessary, and patient-related may be reported for reimbursement purposes. Nursing facility providers may include the level of medicare part A ancillary costs that was included and allowed in the facility's last medicaid cost report filed prior to July 1, 1997. Any subsequent increase in this amount shall be limited to either the increase in the facility's allowable medicare part A ancillary costs or the percentage increase in the cost of medical care reported in the United States department of labor bureau of labor statistics consumer price index for the same time period, whichever is lower. Part B direct costs for medicare shall be excluded from the allowable reimbursement for facilities.

The specific methodology for calculating the limitations and cost-reporting requirements described in this paragraph (c) shall be established by rules promulgated by the state board.

The reimbursement rate components pursuant to subsections (5) to (7) of this section shall be funded entirely through the provider fee assessed pursuant to the provisions of section 25.5-6-203 and any associated federal funds. No general fund moneys shall be used to pay for the reimbursement rate components established pursuant to subsections (5) to (7) of this section.

The state board shall promulgate rules pursuant to the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.,to implement this section, including establishing uniform accounting, reporting, and payment procedures consistent with this section, to determine a nursing facility provider's costs and payments to the provider.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-263), ch. 203, p. 912, § 2, effective May 1, 2009.)

The state department may exempt facilities with five or fewer medicaid beds from the methodology described in this section and instead require the facilities to be reimbursed at the statewide average rate.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1925, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1777, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(a), (3), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9)(b), and (11) amended and (9)(b.3), (9)(b.5), and (9)(b.7) added, (SB 09-263), ch. 203, p. 912, § 2, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(9)(b)(III) added, (HB 10-1324), ch. 14, p. 69, § 1, effective March 1; (9)(b)(III) and (9)(b.7)(II) amended, (HB 10-1379), ch. 214, p. 930, §§ 1, 2, effective May 6.

L. 2011:

(9)(b)(IV) added, (SB 11-215), ch. 148, p. 514, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2012:

(9)(b)(V) added, (HB 12-1340), ch. 154, p. 552, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 2013:

(9)(b)(III) and (9)(b)(IV) repealed, (9)(b)(V) amended, and (9)(b)(VI) added, (HB 13-1152), ch. 162, p. 520, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 2018:

IP(6), (6)(b), and (9)(b.3)(II) amended, (HB 18-1091), ch. 74, p. 643, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(9)(b)(VII) added, (HB 20-1362), ch. 203, p. 1005, § 1, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(2) amended and (12) added, (HB 21-1227), ch. 192, p. 1016, § 3, effective September 7.